Washington statutes.
RCW 10.34.020

Escape—Retaking prisoner—Authority.

If a person arrested escape or be rescued, the person from whose custody he or she made his or her escape, or was rescued, may immediately pursue and retake him or her at any time, and within any place in the state. To retake the person escaping or rescued, the person pursuing has the same power to command assistance as given in cases of arrest.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1034; Code 1881 s 1032; 1873 p 229 s 212; 1854 p 114 s 76; RRS s 2085.]